North Dakota, session 69, HB1533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-21-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15.1-21-21. Financial literacy - Concepts of personal finance - Inclusion in curriculum.
1. Beginning July 1, 2010, eachEach school district shall require each student to complete
one - half unit of financial literacy or ensure that its curriculum for either economics or problems
of democracy includes the exposure of students to concepts of personal finance, including:
a. Checkbook mechanics, including writing checks, balancing, and statement
reconciliationBudgeting and money management;
b. Saving for larger purchasesand investing;
c. Credit, including credit card usage, interest, and fees and debt management;
d. Earning power, including jobs for teenagersBanking and financial services;
e. Taxation and paycheck withholdingsincome;
f. College costsConsumer skills and smart spending;
g. Making and living within a budgetInsurance and risk management; and
h. Mortgages, retirement savings, and investmentsCollege and career financial planning;
i. Retirement planning; and
j. Entrepreneurship and economic concepts.
2. Upon written request, the superintendent of public instruction may allow a school district
annually to select courses other than economics or problems of democracy for purposes of
exposing students to the concepts of personal finance, as listed in this section, provided the
school district can demonstrate that the number of students exposed to the concepts in the
other selected courses would meet or exceed the number of students exposed under the
requirements of subsection 1.
3. The requirements of this section may be provided by the regular classroom teacher of the
course in which the concepts of personal finance are incorporated.

H. B. NO. 1533 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1533.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 3 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State